District of Columbia statutes.
38-191

Department of Education; establishment; authority.

(a)

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), the Council establishes a Department of Education, subordinate to the Mayor. The department shall be headed by a Deputy Mayor for Education, who shall be appointed pursuant to § 1-523.01(a).

(b)

The Department of Education shall:

(1)

Have oversight of the:

(A)

State Superintendent of Education Office;

(B)

Office of Public Education Facilities Modernization; and

(C)

Repealed.

(D)

Development of a comprehensive, District-wide data system that integrates and tracks data across education, justice, and human service agencies.

(2)

Be responsible for the planning, coordination, and supervision of all public education and education-related activities under its jurisdiction, including development and support of programs to improve the delivery of educational services and opportunities, from early childhood to the post-secondary education level, including the District of Columbia Public Schools, public charter schools, and the University of the District of Columbia; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to grant to the Mayor any authority over the University of the District of Columbia that is currently vested in the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia;

(3)

Promote, coordinate, and oversee collaborative efforts among District government agencies to support education and child development as it relates to education, including coordinating the integration of programs and resources;

(4)

Coordinate programs, policies, and objectives of the Mayor with the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia;

(5)

Promote, coordinate, and oversee the enhancement and quality of workforce preparation programs within the State Superintendent of Education Office;

(6)

Promote, coordinate, and oversee the enhancement and quality of adult literacy and adult education programs within the State Superintendent of Education Office;

(7)

Submit to the Mayor, Chancellor, State Board of Education, and the Council the reports required by § 38-353(14) and (15);

(8)

Coordinate the development of the Master Facilities Plan; and

(9)

Provide administrative and technical support for the Common Lottery Board.

(c)

By December 31, 2009, the Deputy Mayor for Education shall submit to the to the Council for approval, by resolution, and to the State Board of Education for review, a plan describing the framework that it shall use to develop a statewide, strategic education and youth development plan (“EYD plan”).

(d)

By September 30, 2010, the Deputy Mayor for Education shall submit to the Council for approval, by resolution, and to the State Board of Education for review, the EYD plan, which shall include:

(1)

A clearly articulated vision statement for children and youth from zero to 24 years of age;

(2)

Stated goals and operational priorities;

(3)

An assessment of needs, including a showing that the comprehensive strategy to address the stated needs is based on research and data;

(4)

A timeline and benchmarks for planning and implementation;

(5)

An operational framework that provides for shared accountability, broad-based civic community involvement, and coordination:

(A)

With District, school, and other community efforts;

(B)

With key stakeholders throughout the community, including those in top public and civic leadership;

(C)

Of the education sector with housing, health, and welfare;

(D)

With economic development policies and plans; and

(E)

Of multiple funding streams to ensure sustainability of the EYD plan;

(6)

An explication of the location and planning, including intended use and design, for the District’s educational facilities and campuses; and

(7)

Recommendations for policy and legislative changes, if needed, to increase the effectiveness of the EYD plan.

(e)

The Mayor shall review and update the EYD plan every 3 years and submit the plan to the Council for approval, by resolution, and to the State Board of Education for review.

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 202, 54 DCR 4102
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4051(a), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 4123, 57 DCR 6242
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 4052(a), 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 2-1593 and § 38-2803.
D.C. Law 18-111, in subsec. (b)(1)(B), inserted “and” at the end; repealed subsec. (b)(1)(C); in subsec. (b)(2), substituted “education level, including the District of Columbia Public Schools, public charter schools, and the University of the District of Columbia; provided,” for “education level; provided,”; and added subsecs. (c), (d), and (e). Prior to repeal, subsec. (b)(1)(C) read as follows: “(C) Office of Ombudsman for Public Education; and”.
D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (b), deleted “and” from the end of par. (6); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of par. (7), and added par. (8).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (b)(9) and made related changes.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4051(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4051(a) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4123 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 days) limited grant-making authority for the Deputy Mayor for Education, see § 4092 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) limited grant-making authority for the Deputy Mayor for Education, see § 4092 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4052(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning the Deputy Mayor for Education’s limited grant-making authority, see §§ 4102 and 4103 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4052(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning the Deputy Mayor for Education’s limited grant-making authority, see §§ 4102 and 4103 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4052(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning the Deputy Mayor for Education’s limited grant-making authority, see §§ 4102 and 4103 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-61, § 4092, see § 7052(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-61, § 4092, see § 7042(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-61, § 4092, see § 7042(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of provisions allowing the Deputy Mayor for Education limited grant-making authority, see §§  4122 and 4152 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Short title: Section 4050 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle F of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Department of Education Establishment Amendment Act of 2009”.

Section 4091 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle I of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “Deputy Mayor for Education Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2013”.

Section 4092 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, for fiscal year 2014, the Deputy Mayor for Education shall have grant-making authority solely for the purpose of providing a capital grant of $6 million for facility construction of a language-immersion public charter school serving middle and high school-aged students in the District; provided, that the grant issued under this section shall be administered pursuant to the requirements set forth in part B of subchapter XII-A of Chapter 3 of Title 1 [§ 1-328.11 et seq.].

Section 4102 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided: “Deputy Mayor for Education limited grant-making authority.

“For Fiscal Year 2015, the Deputy Mayor for Education shall have grant-making authority solely to provide:

“(1) An operational grant of $ 2 million for the development of a language immersion public charter school campus serving middle- and high-school students; provided, that the grant shall not be used for the lease, renovation, or development costs of a temporary location; and

“(2) An operational grant of $ 2 million to support the project development and management of an athletic and community meeting space on the grounds of a public charter school that provides a classical education to students in grades 5 through 12.”

Section 4103 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that grants issued pursuant to § 4102 of the act shall be administered pursuant to the requirements set forth in part B of subchapter XII-A of Chapter 3 of Title 1 [§ 1-328.11 et seq.].

Section 7042(a) of D.C. Law 20-155 repealed D.C. Law 20-61, § 4092.

Section 4122 of D.C. Law 21-36 provided: “(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Deputy Mayor for Education may enter into one or more written agreements for advertisements and sponsorships to fund My School DC EdFest, an annual citywide public school fair.

“(b) No agreement pursuant to this section may require the District to expend funds.

“(c) Only advertisements shall be agreed to in exchange for corporate goods, services, or funds.

“(d) There shall be no limit to the value of goods, services, or funds that may be received from an organization, registered or not, or from an individual, regardless of whether the organization is located, or the individual resides, within the District of Columbia.

“(e) Any sponsorship or advertisement pursuant to this section shall be memorialized by written agreement of the parties.

“(f) The Deputy Mayor for Education shall keep an accounting of all goods, services, and funds received pursuant to this section and shall submit to the Mayor and to the Council of the District of Columbia a report accounting for all goods, services, and funds received pursuant to this section by December 31st of each year.”

Section 4152 of D.C. Law 21-36 provided: “Deputy Mayor for Education limited grant-making authority.

“(a) For Fiscal Year 2016, the Deputy Mayor for Education shall have grant-making authority solely to provide:

“(1) Grants not to exceed $ 270,000 to organizations to provide advocacy, individual counseling, academic support, enrichment, life-skills training, and employment-readiness services for high school students in the District who are at risk of dropping out.

“(2) Grants not to exceed $ 150,000 to organizations to provide a music instruction program serving elementary school students in the District that have limited means to afford or access to instrumental music instruction.

“(3) A grant in an amount not to exceed $ 150,000, for a study, in consultation with the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia, to evaluate the cost, benefits, and feasibility of relocating the University of the District of Columbia Community College to a location east of the Anacostia River. The Deputy Mayor for Education, in consultation with the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia, may conduct the study in lieu of issuing a grant.

“(b) Grants issued under this section shall be administered pursuant to the requirements set forth in the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code Section 1-328.11 et seq.).”